lt-LT: Rantavimo agresyvumas: Agresyvus; Vidutinis; Kalno / ugnikalnio formos; Nėra; Pasyvus; Aštrus; Švelnus; Kita
fr: Agressivité du moletage: Agressif; Moyen; Montagne/volcan; Aucun; Passif; Prononcé; Doux; Autre
zh-TW: 滾花銳利度: 強烈; 中等; 錐形/火山形; 無; 輕度; 尖銳; 平緩; 其他
el: Βαθμός τραχύτητας ανάγλυφης επιφάνειας (Knurl aggressiveness): Έντονο; Μεσαίο; Βουνό/Ηφαίστειο; Κανένα; Ήπιο; Αιχμηρό; Απαλό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Gradul de agresivitate al striațiilor (knurling): Agresivă; Medie; Mountain/Volcano; Fără; Pasivă; Ascuțită; Moale; Altele
pt-PT: Intensidade da serrilha: Agressivo; Médio; Montanha/vulcão; Nenhum; Passivo; Acentuado; Suave; Outro
it: Grado di zigrinatura: Aggressiva; Media; Montagna/vulcano; Nessuna; Passiva; Tagliente; Morbida; Altro
pt-BR: Agressividade do recartilhamento: Agressiva; Média; Montanha/Vulcão; Nenhuma; Passiva; Afiado; Suave; Outra
th: ความคมของลายกันลื่น: หยาบมาก; ปานกลาง; ลายภูเขา/ภูเขาไฟ; ไม่มี; หยาบน้อย; คม; อ่อน; อื่นๆ
pl: Agresywność radełkowania: Agresywne; Średnie; Górskie/wulkaniczne; Brak; Pasywne; Ostre; Miękkie; Inne
sv: Räffelns grovhet: Aggressiv; Medium; Berg/vulkan; Ingen; Passiv; Skarp; Mjuk; Övrigt
da: Riflingens aggressivitet: Aggressiv; Middel; Bjerg/vulkan; Ingen; Passiv; Skarp; Blød; Andet
nl: Karteling agressiviteit: Agressief; Medium; Berg/Vulkaan; Geen; Passief; Scherp; Zacht; Anders
bg-BG: Агресивност на набраздяването: Агресивен; Среден; Планина/вулкан; Няма; Пасивен; Остър; Мек; Друго
zh-CN: 滚花力度: 粗糙; 中等; 山形/火山形纹理; 无纹理; 柔和; 锐利; 柔和; 其他
ko: 널링 자극성: 어그레시브; 미디엄; 마운틴/볼케이노; 없음; 패시브; 날카로움; 부드러움; 기타
hu: Recézés erőssége: Agresszív (erős); Közepes; Hegy / vulkán profilú; Nincs; Passzív (enyhe); Éles; Lágy; Egyéb
de: Aggressivität der Rändelung: Aggressiv; Mittel; Berg/Vulkan; Keine; Passiv; Scharf; Weich; Sonstige
en: Knurl aggressiveness: Aggressive; Medium; Mountain/Volcano; None; Passive; Sharp; Soft; Other
ru: Агрессивность накатки: Агрессивная; Средняя; Mountain/Volcano; Нет; Мягкая; Острый; Мягкий; Другая
hr-HR: Agresivnost nazubljenja: Agresivno; Srednje; Planina/vulkan; Nema; Pasivno; Oštro; Meko; Ostalo
es: Agresividad del moleteado: Agresivo; Medio; Montaña/volcán; Ninguno; Pasivo; Afilado; Suave; Otro
sl-SI: Ostrina grče: Agresivno; Srednje; Gora/vulkan; Brez; Pasivno; Ostro; Mehko; Drugo
sk-SK: Intenzita vrúbkovania: Agresívne; Stredné; Mountain/Volcano; Žiadne; Pasívne; Ostré; Mäkké; Iné
vi: Độ nhám: Gắt; Vừa; Núi/Núi lửa; Không có; Nhẹ; Sắc; Mềm; Khác
cs: Agresivita vroubkování: Agresivní; Střední; Horský/vulkanický; Žádná; Pasivní; Ostrá; Jemná; Jiné
nb: Rillemønsterets grovhet: Aggressiv; Middels; Fjell/vulkan; Ingen; Passiv; Skarp; Myk; Annet
tr: Tırtık agresiflik seviyesi: Agresif; Orta; Dağ/Volkan; Yok; Pasif; Keskin; Yumuşak; Diğer
fi: Pyälletyn kuvion pitävyys: Voimakas; Keskiverto; Vuori/Tulivuori; Ei mitään; Kevyt; Terävä; Pehmeä; Muu
ja: ローレット加工の攻撃性: アグレッシブ; ミディアム; マウンテン/ボルケーノ; なし; パッシブ; シャープ; ソフト; その他